Nevada, session 83, AB85.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 501 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 3.5, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. “Designated invertebrate” means any species of
invertebrate designated as a species of greatest conservation need
in the State Wildlife Action Plan. The term does not include pests.
Sec. 2.5. “Pest” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 555.005.
Sec. 3. “State Wildlife Action Plan” means a statewide plan
prepared by the Department and approved by the United States
Fish and Wildlife Service which sets forth provisions for the
conservation of wildlife and wildlife habitat, including, without
limitation, provisions for assisting in the prevention of any species
of wildlife from becoming threatened or endangered.
Sec. 3.5. 1. In preparing the State Wildlife Action Plan, the
Department shall:
(a) Coordinate with the State Department of Agriculture; and
(b) Consider the Nevada Managed Pollinator Protection Plan.
2. As used in this section, “Nevada Managed Pollinator
Protection Plan” means the plan prepared by the State
-
*AB85_R1*

– 3 –
Department of Agriculture to reduce pesticide exposure to certain
bees.
Sec. 4. NRS 501.001 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.001 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 501.003 to 501.097,
inclusive, and sections 2, 2.5 and 3 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. NRS 501.097 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.097 “Wildlife” means any wild mammal, wild bird, fish,
reptile, amphibian, mollusk , [or] crustacean or designated
invertebrate found naturally in a wild state, whether indigenous to
Nevada or not and whether raised in captivity or not.
Sec. 6. NRS 501.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.110 1. For the purposes of this title, wildlife must be
classified as follows:
(a) Wild mammals, which must be further classified as either
game mammals, fur-bearing mammals, protected mammals or
unprotected mammals.
(b) Wild birds, which must be further classified as either game
birds, protected birds or unprotected birds. Game birds must be
further classified as upland game birds or migratory game birds.
(c) Fish, which must be further classified as either game fish,
protected fish or unprotected fish.
(d) Reptiles, which must be further classified as either protected
reptiles or unprotected reptiles.
(e) Amphibians, which must be further classified as either game
amphibians, protected amphibians or unprotected amphibians.
(f) Mollusks, which must be further classified as either protected
mollusks or unprotected mollusks.
(g) Crustaceans, which must be further classified as either
protected crustaceans or unprotected crustaceans.
(h) Designated invertebrates.
2. Protected wildlife may be further classified as either
sensitive, threatened or endangered.
3. Each species of wildlife must be placed in a classification by
regulation of the Commission and, when it is in the public interest to
do so, species may be moved from one classification to another.
Sec. 7. NRS 503.584 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.584 1. The Legislature finds that:
(a) The economic growth of the State of Nevada has been
attended with some serious and unfortunate consequences. Nevada
has experienced the extermination or extirpation of some of the
State’s native species of animals, including fish , [and] vertebrate
wildlife [.] and designated invertebrates. Serious losses have
occurred and are occurring in other species of native wild animals
-
*AB85_R1*

– 4 –
with important economic, educational, historical, political,
recreational, scientific and aesthetic values.
(b) The people of the State of Nevada have an obligation to
conserve and protect the various species of native fish and wildlife
that are threatened with extinction.
2. The purpose of NRS 503.584 to 503.589, inclusive, is to
provide a program for the:
(a) Conservation, protection, restoration and propagation of
selected species of designated invertebrates, native fish and [other]
vertebrate wildlife, including , without limitation, migratory birds;
and
(b) Perpetuation of the populations and habitats of such species.
Sec. 8. NRS 503.585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.585 A species or subspecies of native fish, wildlife ,
including, without limitation, vertebrates and designated
invertebrates, and other fauna must be regarded as threatened with
extinction when the Commission, after consultation with competent
authorities, determines that its existence is endangered and its
survival requires assistance because of overexploitation, disease or
other factors or its habitat is threatened with destruction, drastic
modification or severe curtailment. Any animal so declared to be
threatened with extinction must be placed on the list of fully
protected species, and no member of its kind may be captured,
removed or destroyed at any time by any means except under
special permit issued by the Department.
Sec. 9. NRS 503.587 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.587 The Commission shall use its authority to manage
land to carry out a program for conserving, protecting, restoring and
propagating selected species of native fish [,] and wildlife [and
other] , including, without limitation, vertebrates and designated
invertebrates, and their habitats which are threatened with
extinction and destruction.
Sec. 10. NRS 503.589 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.589 In carrying out the program authorized by NRS
503.584 to 503.589, inclusive, the Director shall cooperate, to the
maximum extent practicable, with other states and with the counties
in the State of Nevada, and the Director may enter into agreements
with such other states and counties and with other legal entities for
the administration and management of any area established pursuant
to NRS 503.584 to 503.589, inclusive, for the conservation,
protection, restoration and propagation of species of native fish,
wildlife , including, without limitation, vertebrates and designated
invertebrates, and other fauna which are threatened with extinction.
H
-
*AB85_R1*